Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1402
Department of Health and Human Services; program for persons with genetically handicapping conditions; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish and administer a program for the medical care of persons of all ages with genetically handicapping conditions, including cystic fibrosis, hemophilia, and sickle cell disease, through physicians and health care providers that are qualified pursuant to the regulations of the department to provide such medical services. The department shall adopt such rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, as are necessary for the implementation of the provisions of the Genetically Handicapped Persons Act. The department shall establish priorities for the use of funds and provision of services under the Genetically Handicapped Persons Act.

Laws 1980, LB 989, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 351;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 69;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 283.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.